Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3412
Domestic Abuse Death Review Act, how cited.

Sections 71-3412 to 71-3421 shall be known and may be cited as the Domestic Abuse Death Review Act.

Laws 2022, LB741, § 37.